California, session 20252026, AB1396.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 220 of the Penal Code is amended to read:220. (a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who assaults another with intent to commit mayhem, rape, sodomy, oral copulation, or any violation of Section 264.1, 288, or 289 shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, four, or six years.(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who assaults another person under 18 years of age, or a dependent person, age with the intent to commit rape, sodomy, oral copulation, or any violation of Section 264.1, 288, or 289 shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for five, seven, or nine years.(3) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who is a caretaker or other adult who has care or custody of a dependent person who assaults that dependent person with the intent to commit rape, sodomy, oral copulation, or any violation of Section 264.1, 288, or 289 and who knows or should reasonably know that the victim is a dependent person shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for five, seven, or nine years.(b) Any person who, in the commission of a burglary of the first degree, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 460, assaults another with intent to commit rape, sodomy, oral copulation, or any violation of Section 264.1, 288, or 289 shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for life with the possibility of parole.(c) For the purposes of subdivision (a), “dependent person” has the same meaning as in Section 288.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.